Utah statutes.
23-21-2.1.   Management plans.
(1)  The division shall prepare a management plan for each wildlife management
area.  Upon adoption of a management plan by the division director, the lands
shall be managed in accordance with the management plan.
(2)  Each plan shall include:
(a)  a statement of the proposed or anticipated uses;
(b)  a description of any management limitations or conditions covering the
area;
(c)  an inventory of the existing conditions;
(d)  a statement of the desired future condition of the area;
(e)  a list of strategies that may be implemented to achieve the desired
future condition; and
(f)  a description of any reallocation of forage, water, or other resource
appurtenant to the land.
